Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.36.100

Custodial assault.

(1) A person is guilty of custodial assault if that person is not guilty of an assault in the first or second degree and where the person:

(a) Assaults a full or part-time staff member or volunteer, any educational personnel, any personal service provider, or any vendor or agent thereof at any juvenile corrections institution or local juvenile detention facilities who was performing official duties at the time of the assault;

(b) Assaults a full or part-time staff member or volunteer, any educational personnel, any personal service provider, or any vendor or agent thereof at any adult corrections institution or local adult detention facilities who was performing official duties at the time of the assault;

(c)(i) Assaults a full or part-time community correction officer while the officer is performing official duties; or

(ii) Assaults any other full or part-time employee who is employed in a community corrections office while the employee is performing official duties; or

(d) Assaults any volunteer who was assisting a person described in (c) of this subsection at the time of the assault.

(2) Custodial assault is a class C felony.

[ 1988 c 151 s 1; 1987 c 188 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1987 c 188: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1987." [ 1987 c 188 s 3.]